District of Columbia statutes.
9-1209.04

Employment of personnel and equipment to execute work payable from miscellaneous trust fund deposits.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to employ in the execution of work, the cost of which is payable from the appropriation account created in the District of Columbia Appropriation Act, approved April 27, 1904, and known as the miscellaneous trust fund deposits, District of Columbia, necessary personal services, horses, carts, and wagons, and to hire therefor motortrucks when specifically and in writing authorized by the Mayor, to establish and fix fees to be charged for such work, maintain operating balances, and to incur all necessary expenses incidental to carrying on such work, and necessary for the proper execution thereof, including the purchase, exchange, maintenance, and operation of motor vehicles for inspection and transportation purposes; such services and expenses to be paid from said appropriation account or operating balances; provided, that the Mayor may delegate to his duly authorized representatives the employment under this section of laborers, mechanics, and artisans.

History

June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 531, ch. 300, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1438.
1973 Ed., § 7-1238.

References in Text

The “District of Columbia Appropriation Act, approved April 27, 1904,” referred to near the beginning of this section, means the Act of April 27, 1904, 33 Stat. 363, ch. 1628.

Editor's Notes

Deposit of moneys in General Fund: Section 7(d) of the Act of June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, provided that moneys maintained in miscellaneous trust funds pursuant to § 7-1438 shall hereafter be deposited in the General Fund.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.